Missouri, session 2026, HB2937.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 21, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 21.955, to read as follows:
21.955. 1. There is hereby established a joint committee of the general assembly,
which shall be known as the "Joint Committee on Government Efficiency" and shall be
composed of the following members:
(1) Three members of the senate to be appointed by the president pro tempore of
the senate;
(2) Two members of the senate to be appointed by the minority floor leader of
the senate;
(3) Three members of the house of representatives to be appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives; and
(4) Two members of the house of representatives to be appointed by the minority
floor leader of the house of representatives.
2. A majority of the members of the committee shall constitute a quorum, but
the concurrence of a majority of the members shall be required for the determination of
any matter within the committee's duties.
3. The president pro tempore of the senate shall select the chair of the committee
in even-numbered general assemblies and the speaker of the house of representatives
shall select the chair of the committee in odd-numbered general assemblies.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2937 2
4. The joint committee shall:
(1) Review existing state rules and regulations to identify those that are
ineffective, unnecessary, or unduly burdensome and provide recommendations for
rewriting or repealing such rules and regulations in the report required under
subsection 5 of this section;
(2) Make recommendations and issue the report described under subsection 6 of
this section on state budgetary matters, including:
(a) Analyzing agency budgets for potential cost reductions;
(b) Reviewing reports provided by agencies that outline potential cost
reductions, including the reduction of full-time employees; and
(c) Identifying the minimum number of employees required for an agency to
carry out its constitutionally permissible and statutorily mandated functions;
(3) Review reports provided by the office of administration and make
recommendations on the disposition of unused or underutilized state real property in
the report required under subsection 7 of this section;
(4) Review statutes that have a significant impact on the state budget and make
recommendations for changes to such statutes;
(5) Conduct a complete review of the state's social services system, including:
(a) Evaluating the condition of the state's social services system, defined as the
publicly funded system of services intended to meet the needs of vulnerable residents
including, but not limited to, services providing health and mental health care, housing,
and employment supports;
(b) Studying successful social services systems in other states in order to identify
highly effective models;
(c) Evaluating current funding for the state's social services system;
(d) Identifying any gaps in the state's social services system;
(e) Evaluating whether current funding is sufficient to not only maintain the
social services system in its current state but also to ensure that it serves the needs of
Missouri's vulnerable residents moving forward into the twenty-first century;
(f) Making recommendations regarding the condition of the social services
system and funding of the social services system; and
(g) Making recommendations on how to fill any gaps in the social services system
and ensure the state's vulnerable residents are able to access the services they need in
order to maintain their health and well-being and participate fully in their communities;
and
(6) Solicit bids for and review and make recommendations based on the results
of performance audits conducted on each state department, the general assembly, the

HB 2937 3
judiciary, the office of administration, the governor and lieutenant governor, the
attorney general, the secretary of state, the state auditor, and the state treasurer.
5. The joint committee shall compile a full report of its activities for submission
to the general assembly. The report shall be submitted no later than September first of
even-numbered years and may include any recommendations that the committee may
have for legislative action.
6. In conducting its duties under subdivision (2) of subsection 4 of this section,
the joint committee shall report its findings by December first each year, in a report
separate from the reports required under subsections 5 and 7 of this section, and include
a list of full-time employee positions to eliminate from the state budget. The
recommendations of the joint committee in the report under this subsection shall
automatically go into effect on February first of the year immediately following the year
in which the report is issued unless the general assembly passes a resolution or the
governor issues an executive order indicating disapproval of the proposed job
eliminations.
7. In conducting its duties under subdivision (3) of subsection 4 of this section,
the joint committee shall report its findings by December first each year, in a report
separate from the reports required under subsections 5 and 6 of this section, and
provide a list of state real property that should be sold, leased, or otherwise transferred.
The recommendations of the joint committee in the report under this subsection shall
automatically go into effect on February first of the year immediately following the year
in which the report is issued unless the general assembly passes a resolution or the
governor issues an executive order indicating disapproval of the proposed sale, lease, or
transfer of state real property.
8. Staff offices including, but not limited to, house research, house drafting,
senate research, and the joint committee on legislative research shall provide such legal,
research, clerical, technical, and bill drafting services as the joint committee may
require in the performance of its duties.
9. The members of the committee shall serve without compensation, but any
actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the committee's official
duties by the joint committee, its members, and any staff assigned to the committee shall
be paid from the joint contingent fund.
10. The committee shall hold its first meeting within six months from the
effective date of this section and shall meet monthly thereafter.
11. (1) Cost savings resulting from any of the recommendations made under this
section shall be deposited in the government efficiency fund.

HB 2937 4
(2) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Government Efficiency
Fund", which shall consist of moneys collected under this section. The state treasurer
shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state
treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon
appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used solely as provided in this section.
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(4) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
100 other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
101 credited to the fund.
✔